District of Columbia statutes.
31-5311

Consolidations and mergers.

A domestic society may enter into agreements of consolidation or merger in accordance with § 31-4443.

Apr. 29, 1998, D.C. Law 12-86, § 1212, 45 DCR 1172
This section is referenced in § 31-5310.
1981 Ed., § 35-1241.